Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-315 Implied warranty: fitness for
particular purpose. Where the seller at the time of contracting has reason
to know any particular purpose for which the goods are required and that the
buyer is relying on the seller's skill or judgment to select or furnish
suitable goods, there is unless excluded or modified under the next section an
implied warranty that the goods shall be fit for such purpose. [L 1965, c 208,
§2-315; HRS §490:2-315]

Law Journals and Reviews

Tort and Insurance "Reform" in a Common Law Court.
14 UH L. Rev. 55.

Case Notes

A genuine issue of material fact existed as to whether
plaintiff relied on defendant's expertise in supplying a suitable product. 971
F. Supp. 2d 1017 (2013).

Considering the physical appearance of the disclaimer, the
sophistication of the parties, and the circumstances of the negotiation and
signing, the court declined to find that defendant disclaimed the implied
warranty of fitness. 971 F. Supp. 2d 1017 (2013).

Where product is defective, even when seller does not detect
defect, seller is liable under implied warranty of fitness for particular
purpose. 66 H. 237, 659 P.2d 734.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next